Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1011
Mailboxes; Department of Transportation; turnouts; provide.

The Department of Transportation shall provide and maintain gravel, crushed-rock, or hard-surface turnouts for delivery of mail to all mailboxes placed on the highway rights-of-way to conform with section 39-1010.

Laws 1961, c. 194, § 2, p. 593;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 118.